Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1-116, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 281, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1-116), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-116. As used in this title:
1. "Teacher" means any person who is employed to serve as
district superintendent, principal, supervisor, counselor,
librarian, school nurse, athletic trainer, or classroom teacher or
in any other instructional, supervisory or administrative capacity.
The person shall not be deemed qualified unless the person holds a
valid certificate issued by and in accordance with the rules of the
Req. No. 11672 Page 1

Stat e Board of Education or the rules of the State Board of Career
and Technology Education, to perform the particular services for
which the person is employed;
2. "Superintendent" or "superintendent of schools" means the
executive officer of the board of education and the administrative
head of the school system of a district maintaining an accredited
school, provided the person holds an administrator's certificate
recognized by the State Board of Education;
3. "Principal" means any person other than a district
superintendent of schools having supervisory or administrative
authority over any school or school building having two or more
teachers. A teaching principal shall be a principal who devotes at
least one-half (1/2) the time school is in session to classroom
teaching. Teaching principals shall be required to hold
administrative certificates;
4. "Teachers" means, for purposes of complying with the State
Aid Law and other statutes, but not any other provision of law,
which apportion money on the basis of teaching units or the number
of teachers employed or qualified, all persons holding proper
certificates and connected in any capacity with the instruction of
pupils;
5. "Inductee" means any certified teacher who is employed in a
local school to serve as a classroom teacher under the guidance and
assistance of a mentor teacher or teachers;
Req. No. 11672 Page 2

6. "Student teacher" means any student who is enrolled in an
institution of higher learning approved by the State Board of
Education for teacher training and who is jointly assigned by the
institution of higher learning and a board of education of a school
district to perform practice teaching under the direction of a
regularly employed and certified teacher. A student teacher, while
serving an internship under the supervision of a certified teacher,
shall be accorded the same protection of the laws as that accorded
the certified teacher and shall be eligible to receive compensation
beginning on the first day of the internship for up to one full
school year; provided, however, that such compensation shall not be
considered compensation for purposes of teacher retirement or the
minimum salary schedule;
7. "School nurse" means a person employed full time by a board
of education who is a registered nurse licensed by the Oklahoma
State Board of Nurse Registration and Nursing Education and is
certified the same as a teacher by the State Board of Education.
Provided, that any person who is employed as a full-time school
nurse in any school district in Oklahoma who is not registered on
July 2, 1971, may continue to serve in the same capacity; however,
such person shall, under rules adopted by the State Board of
Education, attend classes in nursing and prepare to become
registered. A school nurse employed by a board of education shall

Req. No. 11672 Page 3

be a ccorded the same protection of laws and all other benefits as a
certified teacher;
8. "Athletic trainer" means a person employed full time by a
board of education who is a Certified Athletic Trainer with current
certification from the Board of Certification of the National
Athletic Trainers' Association and is also currently licensed to
practice in the state in accordance with the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision. An athletic trainer employed by a board
of education shall be accorded the same protection of laws and all
other benefits as a certified teacher;
9. "Physical therapist" means a person employed full time by a
board of education who is a Certified Physical Therapist or
Certified Physical Therapist Assistant with current certification
from the Federation of State Boards of Physical Therapy and is also
currently licensed to practice in the state in accordance with the
State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision. A physical
therapist employed by a board of education shall be accorded the
same protection of laws and all other benefits as a certified
teacher;
10. "Occupational therapist" means a person employed full time
by a board of education who is a Certified Occupational Therapist or
Certified Occupational Therapist Assistant with current
certification from the National Board for Certification of
Occupational Therapy and is also currently licensed to practice in
Req. No. 11672 Page 4

the state in accordance with the State Board of Medical Licensure
and Supervision. An occupational therapist employed by a board of
education shall be accorded the same protection of laws and all
other benefits as a certified teacher; and
9. 11. "Support employee" means an employee who provides those
services which are not performed by certified teachers, principals,
superintendents or administrators and which are necessary for the
efficient and satisfactory functioning of a school district.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11672 SW 12/17/24









Req. No. 11672 Page 5